Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5950YH (2) 91 ms/js H.F. 2569 Section 1. Section 364.12, subsection 3, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. Demolish an abandoned structure when 3 required to address a public safety or health concern or abate 4 ongoing nuisance issues and recover the demolition costs by 5 any means from any owner or owners of the structure within the 6 preceding five years if the following conditions are met: 7 (1) The property owner does not perform the demolition of a 8 structure required under this subsection within a reasonable 9 time after notice. 10 (2) The property has been abandoned by the owners, as 11 defined in section 657A.1. 12 (3) The property taxes remain unpaid by the owner or 13 lienholder for a minimum of one year from the date the property 14 is considered abandoned. 15 (4) The property has been cited for causing a nuisance at 16 least six separate times within the preceding six-month period. 17 Sec. 2. Section 657A.10B, Code 2026, is amended by adding 18 the following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. A cityâs plan to demolish a building on 20 abandoned property pursuant to section 364.12 does not preclude 21 a court from granting the city title to the property under this 22 section. 23